Maryland, session 2025, SB0384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
10–205.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Governor
shall include an appropriation in the annual budget of at least the amount specified in
paragraph (4) of this subsection for the sole purpose of providing grants to the Washington
Suburban Transit District to pay the capital costs of the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority.
(2) (i) The Governor is not required to make the appropriation under
paragraph (1) of this subsection in a fiscal year unless the Department certifies to the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0384*

SENATE BILL 384
Governor in writing before the beginning of the immediately preceding fiscal year that the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority has submitted to the Department:
1. Performance and condition assessments and reports
regarding:
A. The safety and reliability of rapid heavy rail and bus
systems;
B. The financial performance of the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority as it relates to rail and bus operations, including fare
box recovery, service per rider, and cost per service hour;
C. The monthly ridership of rail and bus systems broken
down by Metrorail station, Metrorail line, bus route, and bus line;
D. Strategies to reduce costs and improve the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority’s operational efficiency; and
E. The comparison of annual capital investments and
approved budgets; and
2. The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority’s:
A. Annual budget;
B. Annual independent financial audit;
C. Annual National Transit Database profile; and
D. Single audit reports issued in accordance with the
Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for
Federal Awards under 2 C.F.R. Part 200.
(ii) If the Commonwealth of Virginia or the District of Columbia
reduce the amount of dedicated capital funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area
Transit Authority, the Governor may reduce the appropriation under paragraph (1) of this
subsection by a proportional amount.
(iii) 1. The Governor shall withhold 35% of the appropriation
under paragraph (1) of this subsection if:
A. The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority has
received a modified audit opinion as a result of an annual independent audit conducted in
accordance with Article XVI, Section 70 of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
Authority Compact under § 10–204 of this subtitle; and

SENATE BILL 384 3
B. The Department has not certified to the Governor in
writing before the beginning of the immediately preceding fiscal year that the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority has submitted in writing to the board of directors of
the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and the Maryland General Assembly
a satisfactory corrective plan that addresses the reasons for the modified audit opinion.
2. The Governor shall release the portion of the
appropriation withheld under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph if the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority submits in writing to the board of directors of the
Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the Maryland General Assembly a satisfactory corrective action
plan that addresses the reasons for the modified audit opinion.
(3) The Governor shall make the appropriation under paragraph (1) of this
subsection from the Transportation Trust Fund.
(4) [(i)] For the first fiscal year in which the mandated appropriation
under this subsection applies, the appropriation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall equal at least the amount appropriated in the fiscal year 2019 State budget as enacted
for the Washington Suburban Transit District to pay the capital costs of the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.
[(ii) For each fiscal year after the first fiscal year in which the
mandated appropriation under this subsection applies, the appropriation under paragraph
(1) of this subsection shall be equal to the amount of the appropriation for the preceding
fiscal year increased by 3%.]
(g) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (4) AND (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, FROM THE REVENUES AVAILABLE FOR THE
STATE CAPITAL PROGRAM IN THE TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND, THE Governor
shall include in the State budget an appropriation for the purposes specified under
paragraph (2) of this subsection [of $167,000,000 from the revenues available for the State
capital program in the Transportation Trust Fund] IN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE
STATE’S PROPORTIONATE SHARE OF $500,000,000 CALCULATED USING THE
METRORAIL OPERATING SUBSIDY ALLOCATION FORMULA ADJUSTED AS REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPHS (4) AND (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) The Department shall provide an annual grant of at least
[$167,000,000] THE AMOUNT THAT THE GOVERNOR IS REQUIRED TO INCLUDE IN THE
STATE BUDGET UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION to the Washington
Suburban Transit District to be used only to pay the capital costs of the Washington
Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.
(3) The grant required under paragraph (2) of this subsection is in addition
to the appropriation required under subsection (f)(1) of this section.

SENATE BILL 384
(4) THE BASE AMOUNT OF $500,000,000 USED TO CALCULATE THE
APPROPRIATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS EQUAL
TO AN AMOUNT ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION, AS MEASURED BY THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX (ALL URBAN CONSUMERS), BEGINNING WITH FISCAL YEAR 2019 AND
ENDING WITH THE FISCAL YEAR THAT SECTION 1 OF CHAPTER ___ (H.B. ___)
(5LR1734) OF THE ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 2025 TAKES EFFECT.
(5) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE $500,000,000 BASE AMOUNT USED
TO CALCULATE THE APPROPRIATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AS ADJUSTED FOR INFLATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, SHALL BE INCREASED BY 3%.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 1 of this Act is contingent on:
(1) the Commonwealth of Virginia enacting legislation that provides
dedicated capital funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority that
includes:
(i) 1. a calculation of each jurisdiction’s proportionate share of a
base amount of capital funding calculated using the Metrorail Operating Subsidy
Allocation Formula; and
2. a base amount of capital funding equal to $500,000,000
adjusted for inflation, as measured by the Consumer Price Index (All Urban Consumers),
beginning with fiscal year 2019 and ending the fiscal year that the legislation is enacted;
and
(ii) an annual 3% increase to the base amount of capital funding; and
(2) the District of Columbia enacting legislation that provides dedicated
capital funding for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority that includes:
(i) 1. a calculation of each jurisdiction’s proportionate share of a
base amount of capital funding calculated using the Metrorail Operating Subsidy
Allocation Formula; and
2. a base amount of capital funding equal to $500,000,000
adjusted for inflation, as measured by the Consumer Price Index (All Urban Consumers),
beginning with fiscal year 2019 and ending the fiscal year that the legislation is enacted;
and
(ii) an annual 3% increase to the base amount of capital funding.

SENATE BILL 384 5
(b) The Department of Transportation shall notify the Department of Legislative
Services in writing within 5 days after both the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District
of Columbia have enacted legislation that meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section.
(c) Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the date that the Department of
Legislative Services receives notice under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.